Georgia statutes. TITLE 49 Social Services
Article 1 Children and Youth Services

Cross references.

Extended care youth services, §

15-11-340

et seq.

Distribution of prostitution proceeds following forfeiture to programs serving child victims, §

16-6-13.3

.

Commencement of juvenile court proceeding for child on aftercare to Division of Youth Services, Uniform Rules for the Juvenile Courts of Georgia, Rule 4.6.

Commitment of child to Division of Youth Services by juvenile court, Uniform Rules for the Juvenile Courts of Georgia, Rule 15.2.

Commitment of child to Division of Youth Services by juvenile court, Uniform Rules for the Juvenile Courts of Georgia, Rule 15.2.

Law reviews.

For note, “Who Calls the Shots?: Parents Versus the Parens Patriae Power of the States to Mandate Vaccines for Children in New York,” see 37 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 637 (2021).

49-5-1.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Children and Youth Act.”

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 81, § 1; Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 49/HB 79.

The 2013 amendment,

effective April 24, 2013, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “This article shall be known and may be cited as” for “The short title of this article shall be” at the beginning of this Code section.

Cross references.

Probation officers, Uniform Rules for the Juvenile Courts of Georgia, Rule 2.4.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Recovery and administration of child support, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Human Resources, Office of Child Support Recovery, Chapter 290-7-1.

49-5-2.
Purpose of article.

The purpose of this article is to promote, safeguard, and protect the well-being and general welfare of children and youth of this state through a comprehensive and coordinated program of public child welfare and youth services, providing for:

Social services and facilities for children and youths who require care, control, protection, treatment, or rehabilitation and for the parents of such children;

Setting of standards for social services and facilities for children and youths;

Cooperation with public and voluntary agencies, organizations, and citizen groups in the development and coordination of programs and activities in behalf of children and youth; and

Promotion of community conditions and resources that help parents to discharge their responsibilities for the care, development, and well-being of their children.

It is the further purpose of this article to provide for a qualified group of citizens and leading professionals who will identify and study the problems of youth, recommend and effect possible solutions, and work actively for state and local action to prevent children and youths from becoming inmates of our prisons, patients in our mental hospitals, and persons dependent upon public assistance programs.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 81, § 2.

49-5-3.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Age or developmentally appropriate” means activities or items that are generally accepted as suitable for children of the same chronological age or level of maturity or that are determined to be developmentally-appropriate for a child, based on the development of cognitive, emotional, physical, and behavioral capacities that are typical for an age or age group. In the case of a specific child, such term also includes activities or items that are suitable for the child based on the developmental stages attained by the child with respect to the cognitive, emotional, physical, and behavioral capacities of the child.

“Caregiver” means a foster parent with whom a child in foster care has been placed or a designated official for a child care institution in which a child in foster care has been placed.

“Child-caring institution” means any institution, society, agency, or facility, whether incorporated or not, which either primarily or incidentally provides full-time care for children through 18 years of age outside of their own homes, subject to such exceptions as may be provided in rules and regulations of the board.

“Child-placing agency” means any institution, society, agency, or facility, whether incorporated or not, which places children in foster homes for temporary care or for adoption.

“Child welfare and youth services” means duties and functions authorized or required by this article to be provided by the department with respect to:

Establishment and enforcement of standards for social services and facilities for children and youths which supplement or substitute for parental care and supervision for the purpose of preventing or remedying or assisting in the solution of problems which may result in neglect, abuse, exploitation, or delinquency of children and youths;

Protecting and caring for dependent children and youths;

Protecting and promoting the welfare of children of working mothers;

Providing social services to children and youths and their parents and care for children and youths born out of wedlock and their mothers;

Promotion of coordination and cooperation among organizations, agencies, and citizen groups in community planning, organization, development, and implementation of such services; and

Otherwise protecting and promoting the welfare of children and youths, including the strengthening of their homes where possible or, where needed, the provision of adequate care of children and youths away from their homes in foster family homes or day-care or other child care facilities.

“Children’s transition care center” means a transition center which provides a temporary, home-like environment for medically fragile children, technology dependent children, and children with special health care needs, up to 21 years of age, who are deemed clinically stable by a physician but dependent on life-sustaining medications, treatments, and equipment and who require assistance with activities of daily living to facilitate transitions from a hospital or other facility to a home or other appropriate setting. Such centers are designated sites that provide child placing services and nursing care, clinical support services, and therapies for short-term stays of one to 14 days and for longer stays of up to 90 days to facilitate transitions of children to homes or other appropriate settings. Extended stays of up to 12 months may be approved by the department by waiver.

“Dependent child or youth” means any person so adjudged under Chapter 11 of Title 15.

“Group-care facility” means a place providing care for groups of children and youths, other than a foster family home.

“Homemaker service” means a service provided by a woman selected for her skills in the care of children and home management and placed in a home to help maintain and preserve the family life during the absence or incapacity of the mother.

“In loco parentis” means a quasi-parental relationship inferred from and implied by the fact that a child or youth has been taken into a family and treated like any other member thereof, unless an express contract exists to the contrary.

“Legal custody” means a legal status created by court order embodying the following rights and responsibilities:

The right to have the physical possession of the child;

The right and the duty to protect, train, and discipline the child;

The responsibility to provide the child with food, clothing, shelter, education, and ordinary medical care; and

The right to determine where and with whom the child shall live,

provided that these rights and responsibilities shall be exercised subject to the powers, rights, duties, and responsibilities of the guardian of the person of the child and subject to any residual parental rights and responsibilities. These rights shall be subject to judicial oversight and review pursuant to Code Section 15-11-212.

“Maintenance” means all general expenses for care such as board; shelter; clothing; medical, dental, and hospital care; transportation; and other necessary or incidental expenses.

“Maternity home” means any place in which any person, society, agency, corporation, or facility receives, treats, or cares for, within any six-month period, more than one pregnant woman whose child is to be born out of wedlock, either before, during, or within two weeks after childbirth. This definition shall not include women who receive maternity care in the home of a relative or in general or special hospitals, licensed according to law, in which maternity treatment and care is part of the medical services performed and the care of children is only brief and incidental.

(13.1)

“Maternity supportive housing residence” means a residential home that houses on behalf of a nonprofit organization up to six pregnant women aged 18 years or older and their minor children at any one time during the woman’s pregnancy and up to 18 months after childbirth; provided, however, that no medical services shall be provided. This term shall not include: (i) a child welfare agency, as defined in Code Section 49-5-12; (ii) the residential home of a relative in which a woman receives maternity care; or (iii) a general or special hospital.

“Probation” means a legal status created by court order following adjudication in a delinquency case, whereby a child or youth is permitted to remain in the community, subject to supervision by the court or an agency designated by the court and subject to being returned to court at any time during the period of probation.

“Protective supervision” means a legal status created by court order following adjudication in a dependency case, whereby a child’s place of abode is not changed but assistance directed at correcting the dependency is provided through the court or an agency designated by the court.

“Reasonable and prudent parent standard” means the standard characterized by careful and sensible parental decisions that maintain the health, safety, and best interests of a child while at the same time encouraging the emotional and developmental growth of the child, that a caregiver shall use when determining whether to allow a child in foster care under the responsibility of the department to participate in extracurricular, enrichment, cultural, and social activities.

“Shelter” or “shelter care” means temporary care in a nonsecurity or open type of facility.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 81, § 3; Ga. L. 1982, p. 706, §§ 2, 6-8; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1720, § 16; Ga. L. 1991, p. 408, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1983, § 25; Ga. L. 1994, p. 97, § 49; Ga. L. 2004, p. 645, § 7; Ga. L. 2007, p. 590, § 3/HB 153; Ga. L. 2008, p. 1145, § 1/HB 984; Ga. L. 2013, p. 294, § 4-54/HB 242; Ga. L. 2015, p. 552, § 5/SB 138; Ga. L. 2022, p. 375, § 2/SB 116.

The 2013 amendment,

effective January 1, 2014, substituted “dependent children” for “deprived children” in subparagraph (3)(B); substituted “ ‘Dependent child or youth’ ” for “ ‘Deprived child or youth’ ” in paragraph (5); substituted “Code Section 15-11-212” for “Code Section 15-11-55” in the last sentence of paragraph (12); and substituted “dependency” for “deprivation” twice in paragraph (16). See editor’s note for applicability.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, added paragraphs (1) and (2); redesignated former paragraphs (1) through (5) as present paragraphs (3) through (7), respectively; deleted former paragraphs (6), (7), and (8), each of which read “Reserved.”; redesignated former paragraph (9) as present paragraph (8); deleted former paragraph (9.1), which read “Reserved.”; redesignated former paragraphs (10) through (16) as present paragraphs (9) through (15), respectively; and added paragraph (16).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added paragraph (13.1).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1991, a hyphen was deleted from the phrase “child care” in subparagraph (3)(F).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 294, § 5-1/HB 242, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2014, and shall apply to all offenses which occur and juvenile proceedings commenced on and after such date. Any offense occurring before January 1, 2014, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such offense and shall be considered a prior adjudication for the purpose of imposing a disposition that provides for a different penalty for subsequent adjudications, of whatever class, pursuant to this Act. The enactment of this Act shall not affect any prosecutions for acts occurring before January 1, 2014, and shall not act as an abatement of any such prosecutions.”

Ga. L. 2022, p. 375, § 1/SB 116, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as ‘Betsy’s Law.’”

49-5-4.
Other state departments, agencies, officers, and employees to assist department.

It shall be the duty of all other state departments, agencies, officers, and employees to assure the most effective coordination and use of state resources, personnel, and facilities for the benefit of children and youths and to assist the Department of Human Services in effectuating the purposes of this article by making available to the department, upon request of the board or the commissioner and to the extent permissible by law, the services, resources, personnel, and facilities of their respective departments and agencies.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 81, § 4; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 49; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-2/HB 228.

49-5-4.1.
Child welfare agency public scorecard established.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Affected agency” means any state agency, department, division, or office which requires a license or commission from the department for child welfare agencies, including, but not limited to, the Division of Family and Children Services, Department of Human Services, Department of Juvenile Justice, Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities, or Department of Community Health.

“Child welfare agency” means any child-caring institution, child-placing agency, children’s transition care center, or maternity home.

“Services” means direct care, treatment, custodial responsibilities, or any combination thereof provided for children.

The Department of Human Services, in conjunction with other affected agencies and representatives of child welfare agencies, shall establish a child welfare agency public scorecard to score child welfare agencies. Affected agencies shall cooperate with the department to develop and establish the child welfare agency public scorecard.

The public scorecard for child welfare agencies and any explanation for the basis of any score on the scorecard shall be published in a single location on a website for public review. Such website shall provide scores for each child welfare agency by the affected agency that is responsible for the regulation of or contracting with each particular child welfare agency. The score shall be posted within 30 days of the completion of an inspection, or if appealed pursuant to subsection (e) of this Code section, the revised score, if any, shall be posted within 30 days of the conclusion of the appeal.

The scores shall be based on an established published formula with weight appropriately given for each agency’s compliance or noncompliance with applicable laws; rules; contracts; court orders; measures of treatment; behavioral, vocational, and educational outcomes for persons receiving services; and other pertinent information, based on empirical evidence to the greatest extent possible.

The department shall provide child welfare agencies with advanced written notice of the scores to be posted. A child welfare agency may contest a score in accordance with department rules by filing a written appeal with the department within ten days from receipt of such notice. If a child welfare agency contests such score, the department shall note on the website that the score is under appeal, until such appeal is concluded. Within ten days of receipt of a child welfare agency’s written contest of a score, the department shall hold a meeting with the child welfare agency and any affected agency whose score is contested. The meeting shall be for the parties to discuss the score and basis for the score. Within 30 days after the meeting, the commissioner’s designee shall issue written notice confirming or revising the score. After issuance of such written notice, the child welfare agency may contest the score as a contested case under Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” except that hearings held relating to such action by the department may be closed to the public if the hearing officer determines that an open hearing would be detrimental to the physical or mental health of any child who will testify at such hearing.

In consultation with other affected agencies, the department shall promulgate rules and regulations consistent with this Code section, including establishing criteria which must be met in order for a child welfare agency to contest or appeal a score.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to affect the ability of any affected agency, in its sole discretion, to contract with any child welfare agency or to exercise the rights of the affected agency under the terms and conditions of any existing contract with a child welfare agency.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-5-4.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 773, § 5/HB 905; Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 49/HB 323.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective March 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment,

effective May 9, 2017, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised punctuation in subsection (c).

49-5-5.
Powers and duties of board; rules and regulations for training schools and other facilities.

The board shall perform duties required of it by this article and shall, in addition thereto, be responsible for adoption of all policies and promulgation of all rules and regulations not in conflict with this article that may be necessary and appropriate to the administration of the department, to the accomplishment of the purposes of this article, and to the performance of the duties and functions of the department as set forth in this article.

The board shall establish rules and regulations for the government, operation, and maintenance of all training schools, facilities, and institutions now or hereafter under the jurisdiction and control of the department, bearing in mind at all times that the purpose for existence and operation of such schools, facilities, and institutions and all activities carried on therein shall be to carry out the rehabilitative program provided for by this article and to restore and build up the self-respect and self-reliance of children and youths lodged therein so as to qualify and equip them for good citizenship and honorable employment.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 81, § 6.

49-5-6.
Merit system to conform to federal standards; power to employ and contract for professional services; employment and dismissal procedures; membership in state retirement system.

The department shall conform to federal standards for a merit system of personnel administration in the respects necessary for receiving federal grants and the board is authorized and empowered to effect such changes as may, from time to time, be necessary in order to comply with such standards.

The department is authorized to employ, on a full or part-time basis, such medical, psychiatric, social work, supervisory, institutional, and other professional personnel and such clerical and other employees as may be necessary to discharge the duties of the department under this chapter. The department is also authorized to contract for such professional services as may be necessary.

Superintendents of training schools and other facilities and institutions now or hereafter under the jurisdiction and control of the department shall be employed and dismissed for cause by the board on the recommendation of the commissioner. Professional personnel and other employees of such training schools, facilities, and institutions shall be employed and dismissed for cause by the commissioner on the recommendation of the superintendent. All other professional personnel and all other employees of the department under this article shall be employed and dismissed for cause by the commissioner in accordance with such rules and regulations as may be promulgated by the board in regard thereto. Employees of the department under this article shall in all instances be employed and dismissed in accordance with rules and regulations of the State Personnel Board.

All personnel of the Division of Family and Children Services are authorized to be members of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia, Chapter 2 of Title 47. All rights, credits, and funds in that retirement system which are possessed by state personnel transferred by provisions of this article to the division, or otherwise had by persons at the time of employment with the division, are continued and preserved, it being the intention of the General Assembly that such persons shall not lose any rights, credits, or funds to which they may be entitled prior to becoming employees of the division.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 81, § 8; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1983, § 26; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 2/SB 97; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-98/HB 642.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “State Personnel Board” for “State Personnel Administration” at the end of subsection (c).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

49-5-7.
Development and administration of public child welfare and youth services.

The department is designated the exclusive state agency:

For development and administration of a comprehensive state plan and program providing public child welfare and youth services provided for in Title IV, Part B, of the federal Social Security Act;

For administering, supervising, and discharging all duties required by any other act of Congress and any amendments thereto that may now or hereafter allot federal funds for public child welfare and youth services coming within the scope of this article;

For administering and supervising local administration of public child welfare and youth services provided for in this article; and

For receiving and expending on behalf of the state all funds which now or hereafter may become available or allotted to this state by virtue of any appropriation or act of Congress or regulation of the federal government, its agencies, and instrumentalities or be appropriated by the General Assembly for public child welfare and youth services to be administered by the department as provided for in this article. The department is authorized to use so much of funds as may be appropriated by the General Assembly for the purpose of matching federal grants for public child welfare and youth services provided for in this article as may be necessary to secure such grants, derive full advantage to the state of benefits contemplated under the terms of such grants, and comply with the terms of such grants.

County or district departments are designated the local public agencies to administer locally the state plan and program for public child welfare and youth services to be developed in accordance with paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this Code section and other public child welfare and youth services provided for in this article and shall administer them in accordance with rules and regulations to be established by the board. The department shall aid, assist, supervise, coordinate, and direct the administering of such public child welfare and youth services by county or district departments and enforce the rules and regulations of the board in regard thereto.

The cost of all child welfare benefits and services and the cost of administration thereof, authorized by this article, shall be met from such funds as shall be made available therefor from federal and state appropriations. No county shall hereafter be required to participate in the cost of any child welfare benefit or service or in the cost of administration thereof. For the purpose of this subsection, “cost of administration” means salaries and traveling expenses of the county or district director and other employees of the staff of the county or district department engaged in the performance of child welfare and youth services provided for under this article.

Public child welfare and youth services similar to those to be provided by the department under this article and pursuant to Title IV, Part B, of the federal Social Security Act shall, by cooperative agreement or contract by and between the Department of Human Services and county or district departments of family and children services be made available to recipients of and persons who have been or are likely to become recipients of assistance under the temporary assistance for needy families program provided for in Article 5 of Chapter 4 of this title and related federal laws, to include foster home care and other child care referred to in Section 408 of Title IV of the federal Social Security Act. The department is designated the “state public welfare agency” referred to in Sections 408(a) and (f) and 421 of Title IV of the federal Social Security Act.

The commissioner shall, in developing and administering the state plans and programs referred to in paragraph (1) of subsection (a) and in subsection (d) of this Code section, provide by cooperative agreement and contract where necessary for coordination of such plans and programs with a view toward providing welfare and related services on a comprehensive basis that will best promote the welfare of children and youths and their families and best effectuate and coordinate effective implementation and administration of both such plans and programs at the local level of administration.

Nothing in this article is intended to conflict with any federal law or result in loss of eligibility of the department or any other department of state government to any federal funds. In case such a conflict or loss of federal funds should occur by virtue of enactment of any portion of this article, then such portion of this article in conflict with such federal law or otherwise causing loss of such funds is declared to be of no effect and void. The board is authorized and empowered in such event to take such action as may be necessary and to effect such changes within the department as may be necessary to prevent loss of such funds to the department or any other department of state government affected and to secure to the same the full benefit of the federal laws.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 81, § 9; Ga. L. 1969, p. 996, §§ 1, 3; Ga. L. 1970, p. 451, § 3; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1251, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 563, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1455, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 49; Ga. L. 1985, p. 283, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 277, § 2; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 49; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1983, § 27; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 49; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1021, § 7; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-2/HB 228.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1997, p. 1021, § 10, not codified by the General Assembly, provides for severability.

U.S. Code.

Title IV, Part B of the federal Social Security Act, referred to in paragraph (a)(1) and subsection (d) of this Code section, is codified at 42 U.S.C. §§ 620 through 626. Sections 408 and 421 of Title IV of the federal Social Security Act, referred to in subsection (d) of this Code section, are codified at 42 U.S.C. §§ 608 and 621, respectively.

Law reviews.

For article recommending more consistency in age requirements of laws pertaining to the welfare of minors, see 6 Ga. St. B.J. 189 (1969).

For article discussing venue problems in juvenile court practice and suggesting solutions, see 23 Mercer L. Rev. 341 (1972).

For article commenting on the 1997 amendment of this Code section, see 14 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 284 (1997).